dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- थाल्; थाल; 14 -->
    <pardef n="थाल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डुल्; डुल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="डुल/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डुल्; डुल; 3 -->
    <pardef n="डुल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चढाउ; चढाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चढाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रहं; रहं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रहं__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ल्याउ; ल्याउ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ल्याउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डुवाइ; डुवाइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="डुवाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>स्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देखिए; देखिए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देखिए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थाले; थाले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थाले__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दवाउ; दवाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दवाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाल्; पाल्; 3 -->
    <pardef n="पाल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गर्थे; गर्थे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गर्थे__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गुम्; गुम्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गुम्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देखिं; देखिं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देखिं__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रिस्; रिस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रिस/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ायौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पट्यार; पट्यार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पट्यार__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गर; गर; 6 -->
    <pardef n="गर__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनुपर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाइने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िसक्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उठाउँ; उठाउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उठाउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पकाउ; पकाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पकाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पचाउ; पचाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पचाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गा; गा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गा__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उन</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टुङ्ग; टुङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टुङ्ग__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="थाल्"><i>थाल</i><par n="थाल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="डुल्"><i>डुल</i><par n="डुल/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="डुल्"><i>डुल</i><par n="डुल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चढाउ"><i>चढाउ</i><par n="चढाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रहं"><i>रहं</i><par n="रहं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ल्याउ"><i>ल्याउ</i><par n="ल्याउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="डुवाइ"><i>डुवाइ</i><par n="डुवाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="देखिए"><i>देखिए</i><par n="देखिए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थाले"><i>थाले</i><par n="थाले__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दवाउ"><i>दवाउ</i><par n="दवाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाल्"><i>पाल्</i><par n="पाल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्थे"><i>गर्थे</i><par n="गर्थे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गुम्"><i>गुम्</i><par n="गुम्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="देखिं"><i>देखिं</i><par n="देखिं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रिस्"><i>रिस</i><par n="रिस/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पट्यार"><i>पट्यार</i><par n="पट्यार__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर"><i>गर</i><par n="गर__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उठाउँ"><i>उठाउँ</i><par n="उठाउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पकाउ"><i>पकाउ</i><par n="पकाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पचाउ"><i>पचाउ</i><par n="पचाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गा"><i>गा</i><par n="गा__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="टुङ्ग"><i>टुङ्ग</i><par n="टुङ्ग__vblex"/></e>
